Washington statutes.
RCW 43.382.080

Mandatory reporting—Behavior warranting criminal or disciplinary proceedings.

When the ombuds or ombuds' staff member has reasonable cause to believe that any public official, employee, or other person has acted in a manner warranting criminal or disciplinary proceedings, the ombuds or ombuds' staff member shall report the matter, or cause a report to be made, to the appropriate authorities.

[ 2016 c 172 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—2016 c 172: See note following RCW 43.382.005.